Vermont, session 2025-2026, S96.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 28 V.S.A. § 3 is amended to read:
§ 3. GENERAL DEFINITIONS
As used in this title:
(1) “Child” means any person:
VT LEG #381248 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.96
2025 Page 2 of 6
(A) charged with having committed a delinquent act as defined in
33 V.S.A. § 5102 or adjudicated a delinquent and committed to the custody of
the Commissioner; or
(B) charged with being or adjudicated unmanageable as defined by
33 V.S.A. § 5102(3)(C) and (D), and committed to the custody of the
Commissioner for Children and Families and subsequently transferred to the
custody of the Commissioner.
(C) [Repealed.]
(2) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Corrections.
(3) “Correctional facility” or “facility” means any building, enclosure,
space, or structure of or supported by the Department and used for the
confinement of persons committed to the custody of the Commissioner, or for
any other matter related to such confinement.
(4) “Department” means the Department of Corrections.
(5) “Inmate” means any person, not a child, committed to the custody of
the Commissioner pursuant to the law of the State and subsequently committed
to a correctional facility and any person confined at a correctional facility
during the pendency of a prosecution against him or her.
(6) “Law” includes the laws and ordinances of the State, its political
subdivisions, and municipalities.
VT LEG #381248 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.96
2025 Page 3 of 6
(7) “Law enforcement officer” means a State Police officer, a sheriff, a
deputy sheriff, a municipal police officer, a constable, the Commissioner, or a
member of the Department of Corrections when appointed in writing by the
Commissioner and when his or her appointment is filed in the Office of the
Secretary of State. The Commissioner or such member shall have the same
powers as a sheriff.
(8) “Offender” means any person convicted of a crime or offense under
the laws of this State, and, for purposes of work crew community restitution, a
person found in civil contempt under 15 V.S.A. § 603.
(9) “Supervising officer” means the highest administrative officer in
charge of any correctional facility.
(10) “Correctional officer” means any person who is an employee of the
Department of Corrections whose official duties or job classification includes
the supervision or monitoring of a person on parole, probation, or serving any
sentence of incarceration whether inside or outside a correctional facility, and
who has received training, as approved by the Commissioner of Corrections, as
provided in section 551a of this title.
(11) “Recidivism” means a person who is convicted of a criminal
offense after receiving a criminal conviction for a previous crime.
VT LEG #381248 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.96
2025 Page 4 of 6
(12) “Repeat violent offender” means a person who commits repeated
criminal offenses for which the crime type against another individual is
considered violent.
(13) “Restorative justice program” means a program developed and
implemented by the Commissioner, consistent with State policy and legislative
intent as provided by section 2a of this title.
(12)(14) Despite other names this concept has been given in the past or
may be given in the future, “segregation” means a form of separation from the
general population that may or may not include placement in a single-
occupancy cell and that is used for disciplinary, administrative, or other
reasons, but shall not mean confinement to an infirmary or a residential
treatment setting for purposes of evaluation, treatment, or provision of
services.
Sec. 2. 28 V.S.A. § 4 is amended to read:
§ 4. STANDARD MEASURE AND CLASSIFICATIONS OF RECIDIVISM;
REPEAT VIOLENT OFFENDERS
(a) Recidivism.
(1) Classifications. The Department shall calculate classify the rate type
of recidivism based upon offenders persons who are sentenced to more than
one year of incarceration who, after release from incarceration, return to prison
within three years for a conviction for a new offense or a violation of
VT LEG #381248 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.96
2025 Page 5 of 6
supervision resulting, and the new incarceration sentence or time served on the
violation is at least 90 days convicted of a criminal offense and meet one of the
following:
(A) Class one recidivism. Not less than one year has elapsed from
the time of sentencing before the person commits a new offense that results in
a conviction.
(B) Class two recidivism. Not less than three years have elapsed
from the time of sentencing before the person commits a new offense that
results in a conviction.
(C) Class three recidivism. Not less than five years have elapsed
from the time of sentencing before the person commits a new offense that
results in a conviction.
(D) Class four recidivism. Not less than 10 years have elapsed from
the time of sentencing before the person commits a new offense that results in
a conviction.
(2) Calculations.
(A) Persons sentenced to incarceration will be considered eligible to
recidivate upon release from a correctional facility.
(B) Persons sentenced to a noncarceral sentence are considered
eligible to recidivate on the disposition date of a case.
(C) A conviction will determine whether a person has recidivated.
VT LEG #381248 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.96
2025 Page 6 of 6
(D) The arraignment date associated with the conviction will
determine the recidivism classification.
(b) Repeat violent offenders. The Department shall calculate the rate of
repeat violent offenders based upon individuals who are convicted of a
criminal offense and meet one of the following classifications:
(1) Class one repeat violence. Not less than one year has elapsed from
the time of sentencing before the person is convicted of a violent offense.
(2) Class two repeat violence. Not less than three years have elapsed
from the time of sentencing before the person is convicted of a violent offense.
(3) Class three repeat violence. Not less than five years have elapsed
from the time of sentencing before the person is convicted of a violent offense.
(4) Class four repeat violence. Not less than 10 years have elapsed from
the time of sentencing before the person is convicted of a violent offense.
Sec. 3. 28 V.S.A. § 125(b) is amended to read:
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
* * *
(5) “Recidivism” has the same meaning as in section 4 subdivision 3(11)
of this title.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381248 v.1